Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Governor’s Council on Agriculture

247.410.
Definitions. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(1); 1972, ch. 53, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 128, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 447, § 16, effective April 12, 1982; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.413.
Creation of council — Purposes. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(2); 1972, ch. 53, § 2; 1976, ch. 299, § 51; 1982, ch. 447, § 17, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 34, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.417.
Members of council — Officers — Compensation — Meetings — Quorum. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(3); 1972, ch. 53, § 3; 1976, ch. 299, § 52; 1978, ch. 154, § 29, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 396, § 52, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 447, § 18, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 36, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 235, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.420.
Duties and powers of council. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(6); 1972, ch. 53, § 4; 1982, ch. 447, § 19, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 37, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.421.
Agricultural Export Authority. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 447, § 12, effective April 12, 1982; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.423.
Steering committee. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(4); 1972, ch. 53, § 5; 1982, ch. 447, § 20, effective April 12, 1982; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.425.
Division of developmental services — Kentucky farmers advocate’s office. [Repealed.]

247.427.
Kentucky farmers advocate’s office — Staff — Compensation — Duties — Records. [Repealed.]

247.430.
Funds — Construction. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 4(7) to (9); 1972, ch. 53, § 7; 1982, ch. 447, § 21, effective April 12, 1982; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.

247.440.
Commission may select agents; other assistants. [Omitted.]